Connecticut, session 2026, SB00017.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
That the sum of one million five hundred thousand dollars be
appropriated to the Department of Emergency Services and Public
Protection, for Other Expenses, for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027,
to provide grants to municipalities, independent fire companies and
state agencies to remove PFAS from fire apparatus or provide
reimbursement for removal of PFAS from fire apparatus that occurred
prior to July 1, 2023.